tok.foma
# Copyright (C) 2025 Information and Press Service of the Government of Luxembourg

# Modifications of original code made for the Luxembourgish langauge.

# Copyright (C) 2024 Non-Routine LLC.  <lp@louderpages.org>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#


# ------

#
# Generalized Sentence- level tokenization,
#


# Consider the ssentence:
#    “fi, foo 3 000”
# The core will give the tok.FST the following set of symbols:
#    sb f i , eb #x20 sb f o o eb #x20 sb 3 eb #x20 sb 0 0 0 eb
# The tok can then use rules, if it wishes, to see that the following sequence:
#     sb 3 eb #x20 sb 0 0 0 eb
# should be tagged as all one number.
# The core expects tags to be placed only between ‘sb’ and ‘eb’ pairs.
# So, the following is a valid response from the tok for the above sentence:
#     sb f i word , sym eb #x20 sb f o o word eb #x20 sb 3 eb #x20 sb 0 0 0 num eb
# Note how there is no ‘num’ after the “3”.
# The core will pass the string “3 000” to the numbers FST without the “sb” and “eb” symbols, but with the hex whitespace codes.
# 

# Uses sentence level tokenization
### define Space  [eb ?* sb];  # "#x20"

# Brings in alphabet.foma, WSpace, Word
source alphabet.foma
source tok_config.foma

define nonChar bk;
define TokenTypeTag num|dig|sym|word|lseq|graph|abb|csuffix; 
define tag TokenTypeTag | eb | sb | pb;


## The valid formats for numbers are defined in the following file, which is also sourced by numbers.foma
source number_defns.foma
source abbrevs.foma  
source romans.foma
source symbols.foma
define hyphen Hyphen.u;

# pb temporaryily prevent later rules eating from front of previously tagged rule
define from [sb|TokenTypeTag] (\[pb|eb|TokenTypeTag]*);  # and, there must be an sb after any eb so as not to mess inside a space
define to \TokenTypeTag* [pb|eb];  
##define numfrom [sb|TokenTypeTag] (\[pb|eb|TokenTypeTag]*);  # and, there must be an sb after any eb so as not to mess inside a space
##define numto (\[TokenTypeTag|Digit]*) [pb|eb];  

define eosCand  [SilentPunctuation.u+ | %,]+;
define tokEOS 
 	eosCand @-> eos ... || \eosCand _ eb .#. ;           # Take silent sentence enders out of the process

define tokNUM 
#CardinalNumber @-> pb ... num || ? sb _ %. eb .#. 
NZDigit Digit^>1 @-> pb ... num ||  sb _ %. eb .#. 
.o.
[ExpandedArabicNumber]  @-> pb ... num ||  \ExpandedArabicNumber _ \[ExpandedArabicNumber | TokenTypeTag];

define tokDIG # want to avoid the inside of a previously marked num
 [%0 Digit+]  @-> pb ... dig ||   _  [(\[num|dig]*) pb \num+  num] | [\[num|dig]* .#.] ;      # Digit stream begining zero

define tokWORD 
 Abbreviation (INITcase 0:word)  @-> pb ... abb || [sb|TokenTypeTag]  _ eb|pb    # note, we take out any apostrophes
  .o.
 INITcase @-> pb ... word || \Letter _ Letter 
  .o.
 Word  @-> pb ... word || from _ \[Letter | lseq | abb];   # note, we take out any apostrophes

define tokCAMEL  
 [..] -> word pb || lcLetter _ ucLetter (Letter*) word, ucLetter _ ucLetter [[lcLetter - s] | [s lcLetter]];   # CamelCase

source tok_subs.foma

define lseqExclMk1 [sb | hyphen | SilentPunctuation.u];
define lseqExclMk2 [eb |  eos | hyphen | SilentPunctuation.u] ;
define tokLSEQ 
 [
  [[LetterSequence - Abbreviation] | LetterSequenceWV] word:lseq @->  || tag  _ ,,  #  change a whole word into a letter sequence 
	 ucLetter+ word:lseq @->  || ?* lcLetter ?* pb _ ,,
	 ucLetter+ word:lseq @->  || pb _ ?* lcLetter ?*  ,,

   Letter word:lseq @-> || \lseqExclMk1 pb _ , pb _  \lseqExclMk2, .#. sb pb _ , pb _ eb .#.  	  # or a single letter without space on both sides, or a hyphen
 ]
	.o.
	abb:word @-> || _ ;  # now that LSEQ passed, safe for acronyms marked as abbrevs

define tokSYM 
 \[eos | grapheme | Word | Digit | tag] @-> pb ... sym || from  _ to;   # Anything else so far is a symbola provided not bracketed

define tokROMAN 
	[word|lseq]:num @->  || [tag - num - word - dig - lseq]  RomanNumeral _ \[Digit|Letter];  # Roman Numerals

# Go for dates ahead of formatted numbers
define dateMonth [(%0) NZDigit 0:dig] | [[{11} | {12}] 0:num];
define dateDay [%0 NZDigit 0:dig] | [ [[(1|2) Digit] | {30} | {31} ] 0:num];
define dateYear [ ([1 9] | [2 %0]) Digit Digit] 0:num;
define dateSilentDot [%. 0:"graph+silent"];
define dateSilentSlash [%/ 0:"graph+silent"];
define dateSilentDash [%- 0:"graph+silent"];
define tokDATE   
          dateDay dateSilentDash dateMonth  dateSilentDash dateYear  @-> ||  sb _ eb ,,
          dateMonth  dateSilentDash dateDay  dateSilentDash dateYear  @-> ||  sb _ eb ,,
          dateYear  dateSilentDash dateMonth  dateSilentDash dateDay  @-> ||  sb _ eb ,,
          dateDay dateSilentSlash dateMonth  dateSilentSlash dateYear  @-> ||  sb _ eb ,,
          dateMonth  dateSilentSlash dateDay  dateSilentSlash dateYear  @-> ||  sb _ eb ,,
          dateYear  dateSilentSlash dateMonth  dateSilentSlash dateDay  @-> ||  sb _ eb ,,
          dateDay  dateSilentDot dateMonth  dateSilentDot dateYear  @-> ||  sb _ eb ,,
          dateMonth  dateSilentDot dateDay  dateSilentDot dateYear  @-> ||  sb _ eb ,,
          dateYear  dateSilentDot dateMonth  dateSilentDot dateDay  @-> ||  sb _ eb; 

define BasicTokenizer  
  tokDATE
	.o. 
	tokNUM
  .o.
  tokDIG
  .o.  
	tokWORD
	.o.
  tokEOS # waited to let tokWORD pick out abbreviations with dots at end of sentence
  .o.
	tokSPELL
	.o.
 ## tokCAMEL
 ## .o.
	tokINITS
	.o.
  tokLSEQ
  .o.
	[ word:0 %- pb:0 @-> || _ [\tag]* word ]
	.o.
	tokSYM
 .o. 
  csuffix:word -> || _ 
 .o.
  pb:0 -> || _   # clear protective boundaries
	.o.
	  lseq:word @-> || word eb WSpace sb "s" _    # wann s ...
	.o.
	lseq:word @-> || .#. sb E _ eb WSpace sb Letter+ word   # special case of the word "e" in LB.
 .o.
 tokROMAN
; 


define tagIpSector  NZDigit (Digit (Digit)) [0|dig|num]:dig;

# Context parsing
define digPair [[NZDigit Digit 0:"num+postbreak"]|[%0 Digit 0:"dig+postbreak"]];
define ConvertPhoneNumbers # ip addresses, string with period seps and decimal markers ...
    %( sym %+ sym:graph Digit+ num:dig %) sym (eb WSpace sb) NZDigit Digit Digit num:"dig+postbreak" (%- sym:"graph+silent") digPair* (Digit) [dig|num] @->  || sb _ ,,
     %+ sym:graph  3 5 2 0:"dig+postbreak"  [NZDigit Digit Digit 0:"dig+postbreak"] digPair* (Digit) [dig|num] @->  || sb _ ,,
    Digit Digit Digit num:dig [eb WSpace eb Digit Digit [num|dig]]* @->  || sb _ ,,
    6 Digit Digit num:"dig+postbreak" [eb WSpace eb Digit Digit [num|dig]]* @->  || sb _ ,,
  # [ [num:dig]|dig|Digit|sb|eb|WSpace]*  @-> || [%+ sym Digit+]|dig _ eb WSpace sb pb \tag [num|dig]  ,, # phones
	   tagIpSector [ %. [0|sym]:"graph+dot" tagIpSector]^3 @-> || [.#. sb] | WSpace _ eb # ip address
		 ;

#define postalCode sym:"graph+dash" [[Digit Digit 0:"num+postbreak"]|[%0 Digit 0:dig]] [[Digit Digit [num|dig]:"num+postbreak"]|[%0 Digit [num|dig]:dig]]   @-> || sb L lseq %- _  eb;
define postalCode sym:"graph+dash" digPair digPair [num|dig]:0  @-> || sb L lseq %- _  eb;

define numberBanks     Digit^>4 num:dig @->  || tag Digit+ [num|dig] [[? sym]|[eb WSpace sb]] _ ,,   # anything of xxxxx or longer is turned to a digit
		     Digit^>4 num:dig @->  || _  [[? sym]|[eb WSpace sb]] Digit+ [num|dig] ; 


define chunkDigs   
    ((Digit) Digit 0:"dig+postbreak") [Digit Digit Digit 0:"dig+postbreak"]^>1 [dig|num]:0 @-> || \Digit _ ; # mimics thousands periods


# times. These will be tagged internally as num or dig, separated by colons which we want to keep silent
define split0d [%0 (num)];
define HH  [ [ [([split0d|1]) Digit] - %0]  | [2 [%0|1|2|3]] ];
define MM  [[split0d|1|2|3|4|5] Digit];
define SS  [[split0d|1|2|3|4|5] Digit];
define Mins  %0 | [NZDigit (Digit (Digit))];

define TimeSep  [ [num|dig] %: sym:"graph+silent"];
define HHMMSS [HH TimeSep MM TimeSep SS [num|dig]]; #   --- send to numbers 
define HHMM [HH TimeSep MM [num|dig]]; #   --- send to numbers 
define MMSS [Mins TimeSep SS [num|dig]]; #   --- send to numbers 

define TimeMap HHMMSS | [HHMM ((eb WSpace sb) ampm)] | MMSS  @-> || tag _ ;

# ? and ! for intonation, buried away from last position.
# Word-level tokenization ignores any punctuation after those marks until EOS
# In moving to sentence-level we should not mark ?,!,:,; if followed by punctuation.
# 
#  But what about elipsis (three dots) `
# The WhatsApp comma and dot
# WhatsApp adds a dot. How can we tell? We don't want "two dots" announced. And we don't want one dot announced.
# But what if the last symbol is something that we will otherwise name, like a question mark?
# Question marks and exclamation marks must not be named in other circumstances. For example, in quoted text "When?"
# But, watch out for ellipsis ... 


define eosHandling 
				sym:"graph+silent" @-> || eos ?* _      # note: ! and ? go to core for intonation
		;  

# We will make the distinction between the hyphen class, and the minus sign which is a member   
define singleLetter Letter [word | lseq];
define USFormattedNumber NZDigit Digit^<3 [%, Digit^3]^{1,4} ;
define BankingNumber [[FormattedNumber | UnFormattedNumber] DecSep Digit Digit] |
							[[USFormattedNumber | UnFormattedNumber] %. Digit Digit] |
							[Currency [FormattedNumber | UnFormattedNumber] (%.|%, Digit Digit)] ;

define hyphenMap  
      [   # multiples are en- or em-dashes, or visual spacing. Two minuses might be programming i-- but too bad
			  [hyphen sym:"graph+silent"]+ hyphen sym:"sym+postbreak"  @-> ||  _     
				]
				.o.
				[
			 sym:"graph+minus" @->  ||  sb hyphen _ Digit ,   # neg number
			 				[%+ | %=]  ?*  %-  _ ,  
							%-  _ ?* [%+ | %=]   # Arithmetic?
			]
			 .o.
		  [
       sym:"graph+dash" @-> || \Letter singleLetter (eb WSpace sb) hyphen _ (eb WSpace sb) singleLetter , 
			 				[num | dig] hyphen _ Digit,
## indiscriminate attempt at banking app. [sym|sb] hyphen _ (eb WSpace sb) [\TokenTypeTag+ TokenTypeTag]^{0,1} \TokenTypeTag+ [num | dig]  ## any hyphen preceding a number anywhere may be significant allow for zero or one intervening tagged strings
## Banking app which has - (ccy)( )US formatted number
							[sym|sb] hyphen _ (eb WSpace sb) [\TokenTypeTag+ (TokenTypeTag)]^{0,1} (eb WSpace eb) BankingNumber [num | dig]  ## 
			 ]
			 .o.
		   [
			 sym:"sym+postbreak" @->  || sb hyphen _ , hyphen _ eb    # space before or after 
			 ]
			 .o.
			 [
			 sym:"graph+silent"  @->  ||  hyphen _     # otherwise silent (in middle of a word or some construct
			 ]
			 ;

define underscoreMap  
      [   # multiples
			  [%_ sym:"graph+silent"]+ %_ sym:"graph+multiple"  @-> ||  _     # more
			]
				.o.
		   [
			 sym:"sym+postbreak" @->  || sb %_ _ , %_ _ eb    # space before or after 
			 ]
			 .o.
			 [
			 sym:graph  @->  ||  %_ _     # otherwise pronounce it
			 ]
			 ;

define otherMultiples 
		### wait for future	  [%! sym:"sym+exclam"] [%! sym:"graph+silent"]* %! sym:"graph+multiple+prebreak"  @-> ||  _   ,,   
		###	  [%? sym:"sym+query"] [%? sym:"graph+silent"]* %? sym:"graph+multiple+prebreak"  @-> ||  _   ,,   
			  [%! sym:"sym+exclam"] [%! sym:"graph+silent"]* @-> ||  _   ,,   
			  [%? sym:"sym+query"] [%? sym:"graph+silent"]*  @-> ||  _   ,,   
